Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201654-905
Court order for
reimbursement of expenses; liability for expenses; lien.

(1) In addition
to any other sentence given for a violation of section 54-903 or 54-904, the
sentencing court may order the defendant to reimburse a public or private
agency for any unreimbursed expenses
incurred in conjunction with the care, seizure, or disposal of a
livestock animal involved in the violation of such section. Whenever the court
believes that such reimbursement is a proper sentence or at the prosecuting
attorney's request, the court shall order that the presentence investigation
report include documentation regarding the nature and amount of the expenses
incurred. The court may order that reimbursement be made immediately, in specified
installments, or within a specified period of time, not to exceed five years
after the date of judgment.

(2) Even if reimbursement for expenses is not ordered under
subsection (1) of this section, the defendant shall be liable for all expenses
incurred by a public or private agency in conjunction with the care, seizure, or disposal of a livestock animal.
The expenses shall be a lien upon the livestock animal.

Laws 2010, LB865, § 5;

Laws 2013, LB423, § 7.